Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-4414
Fees.

The department shall establish and collect fees for initial licensure and renewal under the Behavior Analyst Practice Act as provided in sections 38-151 to 38-157.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 14.